epay/epayservices/src/main/resources/com/otextpdf/text/pdf/hyphenation/hyph/lv.xml
		2t3nie3ce.
		2v3nie3ce.
		2z3nie3ce.
		2ž3nie3ce.
		2b3nī3ca.
		2c3nī3ca.
		2č3nī3ca.
		2d3nī3ca.
		2f3nī3ca.
		2g3nī3ca.
		2ģ3nī3ca.
		2h3nī3ca.
		2j3nī3ca.
		2k3nī3ca.
		2ķ3nī3ca.
		2l3nī3ca.
		2ļ3nī3ca.
		2m3nī3ca.
		2n3nī3ca.
		2ņ3nī3ca.
		2p3nī3ca.
		2r3nī3ca.
		2s3nī3ca.
		2š3nī3ca.
		2t3nī3ca.
		2v3nī3ca.
		2z3nī3ca.
		2ž3nī3ca.
		2b3ša3na.
		2c3ša3na.
		2č3ša3na.
		2d3ša3na.
		2f3ša3na.
		2g3ša3na.
		2ģ3ša3na.
		2h3ša3na.
		2j3ša3na.
		2k3ša3na.
		2ķ3ša3na.
		2l3ša3na.
		2ļ3ša3na.
		2m3ša3na.
		2n3ša3na.
		2ņ3ša3na.
		2p3ša3na.
		2r3ša3na.
		2s3ša3na.
		2š3ša3na.
		2t3ša3na.
		2v3ša3na.
		2z3ša3na.
		2ž3ša3na.
		2b3ša3nās.
		2c3ša3nās.
		2č3ša3nās.
		2d3ša3nās.
		2f3ša3nās.
		2g3ša3nās.
		2ģ3ša3nās.
		2h3ša3nās.
		2j3ša3nās.
		2k3ša3nās.
		2ķ3ša3nās.
		2l3ša3nās.
		2ļ3ša3nās.
		2m3ša3nās.
		2n3ša3nās.
		2ņ3ša3nās.
		2p3ša3nās.
		2r3ša3nās.
		2s3ša3nās.
		2š3ša3nās.
		2t3ša3nās.
		2v3ša3nās.
		2z3ša3nās.
		2ž3ša3nās.
		2b3ta3la.
		2c3ta3la.
		2č3ta3la.
		2d3ta3la.
		2f3ta3la.
		2g3ta3la.
		2ģ3ta3la.
		2h3ta3la.
		2j3ta3la.
		2k3ta3la.
		2ķ3ta3la.
		2l3ta3la.
		2ļ3ta3la.
		2m3ta3la.
		2n3ta3la.
		2ņ3ta3la.
		2p3ta3la.
		2r3ta3la.
		2s3ta3la.
		2š3ta3la.
		2t3ta3la.
		2v3ta3la.
		2z3ta3la.
		2ž3ta3la.
		2b3tu3ve.
		2c3tu3ve.
		2č3tu3ve.
		2d3tu3ve.
		2f3tu3ve.
		2g3tu3ve.
		2ģ3tu3ve.
		2h3tu3ve.
		2j3tu3ve.
		2k3tu3ve.
		2ķ3tu3ve.
		2l3tu3ve.
		2ļ3tu3ve.
		2m3tu3ve.
		2n3tu3ve.
		2ņ3tu3ve.
		2p3tu3ve.
		2r3tu3ve.
		2s3tu3ve.
		2š3tu3ve.
		2t3tu3ve.
		2v3tu3ve.
		2z3tu3ve.
		2ž3tu3ve.
		.jā3a2
		.ne3a2
		.ie3a2
		.no3a2
		.pa3a2
		.pie3a2
		.sa3a2
		.uz3a2
		.aiz3a2
		.ap3a2
		.at3a2
		.bez3a2
		.pār3a2
		.iz3a2
		.eks3a2
		.vis3a2
		.jā3ā2
		.ne3ā2
		.ie3ā2
		.no3ā2
		.pa3ā2
		.pie3ā2
		.sa3ā2
		.uz3ā2
		.aiz3ā2
		.ap3ā2
		.at3ā2
		.bez3ā2
		.pār3ā2
		.iz3ā2
		.eks3ā2
		.vis3ā2
		.jā3e2
		.ne3e2
		.ie3e2
		.no3e2
		.pa3e2
		.pie3e2
		.sa3e2
		.uz3e2
		.aiz3e2
		.ap3e2
		.at3e2
		.bez3e2
		.pār3e2
		.iz3e2
		.eks3e2
		.vis3e2
		.jā3ē2
		.ne3ē2
		.ie3ē2
		.no3ē2
		.pa3ē2
		.pie3ē2
		.sa3ē2
		.uz3ē2
		.aiz3ē2
		.ap3ē2
		.at3ē2
		.bez3ē2
		.pār3ē2
		.iz3ē2
		.eks3ē2
		.vis3ē2
		.jā3i2
		.ne3i2
		.ie3i2
		.no3i2
		.pa3i2
		.pie3i2
		.sa3i2
		.uz3i2
		.aiz3i2
		.ap3i2
		.at3i2
		.bez3i2
		.pār3i2
		.iz3i2
		.eks3i2
		.vis3i2
		.jā3ī2
		.ne3ī2
		.ie3ī2
		.no3ī2
		.pa3ī2
		.pie3ī2
		.sa3ī2
		.uz3ī2
		.aiz3ī2
		.ap3ī2
		.at3ī2
		.bez3ī2
		.pār3ī2
		.iz3ī2
		.eks3ī2
		.vis3ī2
		.jā3o2
		.ne3o2
		.ie3o2
		.no3o2
		.pa3o2
		.pie3o2
		.sa3o2
		.uz3o2
		.aiz3o2
		.ap3o2
		.at3o2
		.bez3o2
		.pār3o2
		.iz3o2
		.eks3o2
		.vis3o2
		.jā3u2
		.ne3u2
		.ie3u2
		.no3u2
		.pa3u2
		.pie3u2
		.sa3u2
		.uz3u2
		.aiz3u2
		.ap3u2
		.at3u2
		.bez3u2
		.pār3u2
		.iz3u2
		.eks3u2
		.vis3u2
		.jā3ū2
		.ne3ū2
		.ie3ū2
		.no3ū2
		.pa3ū2
		.pie3ū2
		.sa3ū2
		.uz3ū2
		.aiz3ū2
		.ap3ū2
		.at3ū2
		.bez3ū2
		.pār3ū2
		.iz3ū2
		.eks3ū2
		.vis3ū2
		.jā3ie1
		.jā3iz1
		.jā3no1
		.ne3aiz1
		.ne3ap1
		.ne3ie1
		.ne3at1
		.ne3in1
		.ne3iz1
		.ne3sa
		.ne3uz1
		.priek2š1
		4d5ze1me
		.tur2p1m
		il2k1tie
		.spil2g1t
		mē1ne2š1
		1pa1d2smit
		g2š1gal
		k2š1gal
		tran2s
		1port
		vēs2t1n
		vēs2t1k
		pa2t3stā
		pa2s2t3k
		pa2s2t3m
		pa2s2t2s.
		pa2r2k2s.
		pa2r3ket
		sa2ls.
		sa2lds.
		sa2l2d1
		pir2m1r
		pir2m1k
		pir2m2s1
		ot2r1r2
		ot2r1k2
		ir2k3l
		ir2k3ļ
		.adā2m3
		.ai4z5
		ak3me4ņ3
		apak2š3
		ap1au
		kār2t3n
		aug2s2t3
		.at3e2j
		bal2t3ma
		.vie2n1
	</patterns>

</hyphenation-info>
